Utah statutes.
63I-1-263.   Repeal dates, Titles 63 to 63M.

(1)  Section 63A-4-204, authorizing the Risk Management Fund to provide coverage to any public school district which chooses to participate, is repealed July 1, 2016.

(2)  Section 63A-5-603, State Facility Energy Efficiency Fund, is repealed July 1, 2016.

(3)  Section 63C-8-106, Rural residency training program, is repealed July 1, 2015.

(4)  Subsection 63G-6-502(5)(b)(ii) authorizing certain transportation agencies to award a contract for a design-build transportation project in certain circumstances, is repealed July 1, 2015.

(5)  The Resource Development Coordinating Committee, created in Section 63J-4-501, is repealed July 1, 2015.

(6)  Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 4, Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed July 1, 2018.

(7) (a)  Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 11, Recycling Market Development Zone Act, is repealed July 1, 2020.

(b)  Sections 59-7-610 and 59-10-1007 regarding tax credits for certain persons in recycling market development zones, are repealed for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011.

(c)  Notwithstanding Subsection (7)(b), a person may not claim a tax credit under Section 59-7-610 or 59-10-1007:

(i)  for the purchase price of machinery or equipment described in Section 59-7-610 or 59-10-1007, if the machinery or equipment is purchased on or after July 1, 2010; or

(ii)  for an expenditure described in Subsection 59-7-610(1)(b) or 59-10-1007(1)(b), if the expenditure is made on or after July 1, 2010.

(d)  Notwithstanding Subsections (7)(b) and (c), a person may carry forward a tax credit in accordance with Section 59-7-610 or 59-10-1007 if:

(i)  the person is entitled to a tax credit under Section 59-7-610 or 59-10-1007; and

(ii) (A)  for the purchase price of machinery or equipment described in Section 59-7-610 or 59-10-1007, the machinery or equipment is purchased on or before June 30, 2010; or

(B)  for an expenditure described in Subsection 59-7-610(1)(b) or 59-10-1007(1)(b), the expenditure is made on or before June 30, 2010.

(8)  Title 63M, Chapter 7, Part 4, Sentencing Commission, is repealed January 1, 2012.

(9)  The Crime Victim Reparations Board, created in Section 63M-7-504, is repealed July 1, 2017.

(10)  Title 63M, Chapter 8, Utah Commission for Women and Families Act, is repealed July 1, 2011.

(11)  Title 63M, Chapter 9, Families, Agencies, and Communities Together for Children and Youth At Risk Act, is repealed July 1, 2016.

(12)  Title 63M, Chapter 11, Utah Commission on Aging, is repealed July 1, 2012.

